Utah statutes.
59-1-1306.   Material advisor disclosure of reportable transactions.
(1) (a)  A material advisor shall disclose a reportable transaction to the
commission on a form provided by the commission.
(b)  The disclosure described in Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  shall include information:
(A)  identifying and describing the transaction; and
(B)  describing any potential tax benefits expected to result from the
transaction; and
(ii)  may include information other than the information described in
Subsection (1)(b)(i) as required by the commission.
(2)  If a material advisor described in Subsection (1) is required to file a
return disclosing a reportable transaction under Section 6111, Internal
Revenue Code, the material advisor shall provide the commission a copy of that
return.
(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules prescribing:
(a)  the date a:
(i)  disclosure required by Subsection (1) shall be filed with the commission;
and
(ii)  copy of a return required by Subsection (2) shall be filed with the
commission;
(b)  that only one person may be required to meet the requirements of
Subsection (1) or (2) if two or more persons would otherwise be required to
meet the requirements of Subsection (1) or (2); and
(c)  exemptions from Subsection (1) or (2).
